New York, session 2025-2026, S3382.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 11-0704 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as added by chapter 507 of the laws of 2010, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. the person to whom such license and permit was issued: (a) dies 5 within one year of the issuance date of such license and permit; or (b) 6 dies before the age of twelve; and 7 § 2. Subdivision 6 of section 11-0704 of the environmental conserva- 8 tion law, as added by chapter 507 of the laws of 2010, is amended to 9 read as follows: 10 6. [The] the application for transfer is made within three years of 11 the issuance of the license, or in the case of paragraph (b) of subdivi- 12 sion one of this section, within three years of the child's death; and 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06756-01-5